Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1332
Appraisal of commercial or industrial property; Property Tax Administrator; powers.

Whenever a county by or pursuant to action of its county board requests the Property Tax Administrator to provide engineering, professional, or technical services for the appraisal of major commercial or industrial properties, the Property Tax Administrator may, within his or her available resources, provide such services. The county shall pay to the Property Tax Administrator the actual cost of such services.

Laws 1969, c. 622, § 8, p. 2514;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 128;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 47.